Utah statutes.
48-2c-605.   No formalities required to maintain limited liability.

The failure of a company to maintain records, to hold meetings, or to observe any formalities or requirements imposed by this chapter or by the articles of organization or the operating agreement is not a ground for imposing personal liability on any member, manager, or employee for any debt, obligation, or liability of the company.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

